Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-509
Rental and use charges; collection; use.

(1) The mayor and city council of any city or the board of trustees of any village, in addition to other sources of revenue available to the city or village, may by ordinance set up a rental or use charge, to be collected from users of any system of sewerage, and provide methods for collection of such rental or use charge. The charges shall be charged to each property served by the sewerage system, shall be a lien upon the property served, and may be collected either from the owner or the person, firm, or corporation requesting the service.

(2) All money raised from the charges referred to in subsection (1) of this section shall be used for maintenance or operation of the existing system of sewerage, for payment of principal and interest on bonds issued as is provided for in section 17-925, 18-502, 18-506, or 19-1305, or to create a reserve fund for the purpose of future maintenance or construction of a new sewer system for the city or village. Any funds raised from this charge shall be placed in a separate fund and not be used for any other purpose or diverted to any other fund.

Laws 1951, c. 19, § 5, p. 101;

Laws 1957, c. 40, § 3, p. 215;

Laws 1971, LB 883, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 39.
August 28, 2021
Provision for sewer rental or use charges did not conflict with similar charges authorized for cities of the metropolitan class. Metropolitan Utilities Dist. v. City of Omaha, 171 Neb. 609, 107 N.W.2d 397 (1961).